Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 20. Trial.

Collateral references. —

Ashley Lipson, Art of Advocacy: Demonstrative Evidence (Matthew Bender).

David B. Baum, Art of Advocacy: Preparation of the Case (Matthew Bender).

Arthur Ian Miltz, Art of Advocacy: Discovery (Matthew Bender).

Leonard Decof, Art of Advocacy: Opening Statement (Matthew Bender).

Scott Baldwin, Art of Advocacy: Direct Examination (Matthew Bender).

Ward Wagner, Jr., Art of Advocacy: Jury Selection (Matthew Bender).

Henry G. Miller, Art of Advocacy: Settlement (Matthew Bender).

Ashley S. Lipson, Art of Advocacy: Documentary Evidence (Matthew Bender).

Marshall Houts, Art of Advocacy: Cross Examination of Medical Experts (Matthew Bender).

Robert L. Habush, Art of Advocacy: Cross Examination of Non-Medical Experts (Matthew Bender).

Lawrence J. Smith, Art of Advocacy: Summation (Matthew Bender).

Houts and Rogosheske, Art of Advocacy: Appeals (Matthew Bender).